Wyoming, session 2026, HB0171.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-24-104(a) is amended to read:

9-24-104. Distribution of revenue.

(a) Not later than the fifteenth day of each month,
in accordance with commission rules, a sports wagering
operator shall remit ten percent (10%) of online sports
wagering revenue from the prior month to the commission,
HB0171

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0473
except as provided in subsection (b) of this section. Each
fiscal year, the first three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000.00) of revenue generated under this section is
continuously appropriated to the department of health to be
distributed to the counties commission for the purpose of
funding county health programs to prevent and treat
problematic gambling behavior and the remainder of monies
remitted to the commission shall be deposited by the state
treasurer into the general fund. For purposes of this
subsection, the commission may contract with persons for
the provision of programs to prevent and treat problematic
gambling behavior.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0171